dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Jt Y 80
SFX Jt ти л .
SFX Jt ти ла .
SFX Jt ти ло .
SFX Jt ти ли .
SFX Jt гати жу .
SFX Jt гати жем .
SFX Jt гати жеш .
SFX Jt гати же .
SFX Jt гати жемо .
SFX Jt гати жете .
SFX Jt гати жут .
SFX Jt ти х .
SFX Jt ти ше .
SFX Jt ти хмо .
SFX Jt ти сте .
SFX Jt ти ху .
SFX Jt гати жи .
SFX Jt гати жимо .
SFX Jt гати жите .
SFX Jt гати жучи .
SFX Jt гати жучего .
SFX Jt гати жучему .
SFX Jt гати жучим .
SFX Jt гати жучем .
SFX Jt гати жучих .
SFX Jt гати жучими .
SFX Jt гати жуча .
SFX Jt гати жучу .
SFX Jt гати жучеј .
SFX Jt гати жучеју .
SFX Jt гати жуче .
SFX Jt гати жемы .
SFX Jt гати жемого .
SFX Jt гати жемому .
SFX Jt гати жемым .
SFX Jt гати жемом .
SFX Jt гати жемо .
SFX Jt гати жема .
SFX Jt гати жему .
SFX Jt гати жемој .
SFX Jt гати жемоју .
SFX Jt гати жеми .
SFX Jt гати жеме .
SFX Jt гати жемых .
SFX Jt гати жемым .
SFX Jt гати жемыми .
SFX Jt ти вши .
SFX Jt ти вшего .
SFX Jt ти вшему .
SFX Jt ти вшим .
SFX Jt ти вшем .
SFX Jt ти вших .
SFX Jt ти вшими .
SFX Jt ти вша .
SFX Jt ти вшу .
SFX Jt ти вшеј .
SFX Jt ти вшеју .
SFX Jt ти вше .
SFX Jt ти ны .
SFX Jt ти ного .
SFX Jt ти ному .
SFX Jt ти ным .
SFX Jt ти ном .
SFX Jt ти ни .
SFX Jt ти не .
SFX Jt ти ных .
SFX Jt ти ными .
SFX Jt ти на .
SFX Jt ти ну .
SFX Jt ти ној .
SFX Jt ти ноју .
SFX Jt ти но .
SFX Jt ти нје/xPxE .
SFX Jt ти нја/xPxE .
SFX Jt ти нју/xPxE .
SFX Jt ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX Jt ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX Jt ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX Jt ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX Jt ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX Ju Y 28
SFX Ju 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ju ы о/xBxPxE .
SFX Ju ы а/xPxE .
SFX Ju ы ого/xPxE .
SFX Ju ы у/xPxE .
SFX Ju ы ој/xPxE .
SFX Ju ы ом/xPxE .
SFX Ju ы ому/xPxE .
SFX Ju 0 м/xPxE .
SFX Ju ы оју/xPxE .
SFX Ju ы и/xPxE .
SFX Ju ы е/xPxE .
SFX Ju 0 х/xPxE .
SFX Ju 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX Ju алы енши/zx .
SFX Ju алы еншего/zx .
SFX Ju алы еншему/zx .
SFX Ju алы еншим/zx .
SFX Ju алы еншем/zx .
SFX Ju алы енше/zx .
SFX Ju алы енша/zx .
SFX Ju алы еншу/zx .
SFX Ju алы еншеј/zx .
SFX Ju алы еншеју/zx .
SFX Ju алы енших/zx .
SFX Ju алы еншим/zx .
SFX Ju алы еншими/zx .
SFX Ju алы енје/zx .

SFX Jv Y 13
SFX Jv ынебуд онебуд .
SFX Jv ынебуд анебуд .
SFX Jv ынебуд огонебуд .
SFX Jv ынебуд унебуд .
SFX Jv ынебуд ојнебуд .
SFX Jv ынебуд омнебуд .
SFX Jv ынебуд омунебуд .
SFX Jv небуд мнебуд .
SFX Jv ынебуд ојунебуд .
SFX Jv ынебуд инебуд .
SFX Jv ынебуд енебуд .
SFX Jv небуд хнебуд .
SFX Jv небуд минебуд .

SFX Jw Y 9
SFX Jw 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Jw е е/xPxBxO .
SFX Jw е а/xPxE .
SFX Jw је еј/xPxE .
SFX Jw е у/xPxE .
SFX Jw е ах/xPxE .
SFX Jw е ам/xPxE .
SFX Jw 0 м/xPxE .
SFX Jw е ами/xPxE .

SFX Jx Y 11
SFX Jx 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Jx 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Jx ох х/xPxE .
SFX Jx ох ха/xPxE .
SFX Jx 0 а/xPxE .
SFX Jx ох ху/xPxE .
SFX Jx 0 у/xPxE .
SFX Jx ох хом/xPxE .
SFX Jx 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX Jx ох ше/xPxE .
SFX Jx х ше/xPxE .

SFX Jy Y 71
SFX Jy ти л .
SFX Jy ти ла .
SFX Jy ти ло .
SFX Jy ти ли .
SFX Jy ти у .
SFX Jy кти чем .
SFX Jy кти чеш .
SFX Jy кти че .
SFX Jy кти чемо .
SFX Jy кти чете .
SFX Jy ти ут .
SFX Jy кти чех .
SFX Jy кти чеше .
SFX Jy кти чехмо .
SFX Jy кти честе .
SFX Jy кти чеху .
SFX Jy кти чи .
SFX Jy кти чимо .
SFX Jy кти чите .
SFX Jy ти учи .
SFX Jy ти учего .
SFX Jy ти учему .
SFX Jy ти учим .
SFX Jy ти учем .
SFX Jy ти учих .
SFX Jy ти учими .
SFX Jy ти уча .
SFX Jy ти учу .
SFX Jy ти учеј .
SFX Jy ти учеју .
SFX Jy ти уче .
SFX Jy кти чемы .
SFX Jy кти чемого .
SFX Jy кти чемому .
SFX Jy кти чемым .
SFX Jy кти чемом .
SFX Jy кти чемо .
SFX Jy кти чема .
SFX Jy кти чему .
SFX Jy кти чемој .
SFX Jy кти чемоју .
SFX Jy кти чеми .
SFX Jy кти чеме .
SFX Jy кти чемых .
SFX Jy кти чемым .
SFX Jy кти чемыми .
SFX Jy ти ши .
SFX Jy ти ша .
SFX Jy ти ше .
SFX Jy кти чены .
SFX Jy кти ченого .
SFX Jy кти ченому .
SFX Jy кти ченым .
SFX Jy кти ченом .
SFX Jy кти чени .
SFX Jy кти чене .
SFX Jy кти ченых .
SFX Jy кти чеными .
SFX Jy кти чена .
SFX Jy кти чену .
SFX Jy кти ченој .
SFX Jy кти ченоју .
SFX Jy кти чено .
SFX Jy кти ченје/xPxE .
SFX Jy кти ченја/xPxE .
SFX Jy кти ченју/xPxE .
SFX Jy кти ченјем/xPxE .
SFX Jy кти чениј/xPxE .
SFX Jy кти ченјам/xPxE .
SFX Jy кти ченјами/xPxE .
SFX Jy кти ченјах/xPxE .

SFX Jz Y 80
SFX Jz ти л .
SFX Jz ти ла .
SFX Jz ти ло .
SFX Jz ти ли .
SFX Jz тєти чу .
SFX Jz тєти чем .
SFX Jz тєти чеш .
SFX Jz тєти че .
SFX Jz тєти чемо .
SFX Jz тєти чете .
SFX Jz тєти чут .
SFX Jz ти х .
SFX Jz ти ше .
SFX Jz ти хмо .
SFX Jz ти сте .
SFX Jz ти ху .
SFX Jz тєти чи .
SFX Jz тєти чимо .
SFX Jz тєти чите .
SFX Jz тєти чучи .
SFX Jz тєти чучего .
SFX Jz тєти чучему .
SFX Jz тєти чучим .
SFX Jz тєти чучем .
SFX Jz тєти чучих .
SFX Jz тєти чучими .
SFX Jz тєти чуча .
SFX Jz тєти чучу .
SFX Jz тєти чучеј .
SFX Jz тєти чучеју .
SFX Jz тєти чуче .
SFX Jz тєти чемы .
SFX Jz тєти чемого .
SFX Jz тєти чемому .
SFX Jz тєти чемым .
SFX Jz тєти чемом .
SFX Jz тєти чемо .
SFX Jz тєти чема .
SFX Jz тєти чему .
SFX Jz тєти чемој .
SFX Jz тєти чемоју .
SFX Jz тєти чеми .
SFX Jz тєти чеме .
SFX Jz тєти чемых .
SFX Jz тєти чемым .
SFX Jz тєти чемыми .
SFX Jz ти вши .
SFX Jz ти вшего .
SFX Jz ти вшему .
SFX Jz ти вшим .
SFX Jz ти вшем .
SFX Jz ти вших .
SFX Jz ти вшими .
SFX Jz ти вша .
SFX Jz ти вшу .
SFX Jz ти вшеј .
SFX Jz ти вшеју .
SFX Jz ти вше .
SFX Jz ти ны .
SFX Jz ти ного .
SFX Jz ти ному .
SFX Jz ти ным .
SFX Jz ти ном .
SFX Jz ти ни .
SFX Jz ти не .
SFX Jz ти ных .
SFX Jz ти ными .
SFX Jz ти на .
SFX Jz ти ну .
SFX Jz ти ној .
SFX Jz ти ноју .
SFX Jz ти но .
SFX Jz ти нје/xPxE .
SFX Jz ти нја/xPxE .
SFX Jz ти нју/xPxE .
SFX Jz ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX Jz ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX Jz ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX Jz ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX Jz ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX KA Y 80
SFX KA ти л .
SFX KA ти ла .
SFX KA ти ло .
SFX KA ти ли .
SFX KA дєти м .
SFX KA дєти ш .
SFX KA дєти 0 .
SFX KA дєти мо .
SFX KA дєти те .
SFX KA єти ут .
SFX KA ти х .
SFX KA ти ше .
SFX KA ти хмо .
SFX KA ти сте .
SFX KA ти ху .
SFX KA єти 0 .
SFX KA єти мо .
SFX KA єти те .
SFX KA єти учи .
SFX KA єти учего .
SFX KA єти учему .
SFX KA єти учим .
SFX KA єти учем .
SFX KA єти учих .
SFX KA єти учими .
SFX KA єти уча .
SFX KA єти учу .
SFX KA єти учеј .
SFX KA єти учеју .
SFX KA єти уче .
SFX KA єти омы .
SFX KA єти омого .
SFX KA єти омому .
SFX KA єти омым .
SFX KA єти омом .
SFX KA єти омо .
SFX KA єти ома .
SFX KA єти ому .
SFX KA єти омој .
SFX KA єти омоју .
SFX KA єти оми .
SFX KA єти оме .
SFX KA єти омых .
SFX KA єти омым .
SFX KA єти омыми .
SFX KA єти омо .
SFX KA ти вши .
SFX KA ти вшего .
SFX KA ти вшему .
SFX KA ти вшим .
SFX KA ти вшем .
SFX KA ти вших .
SFX KA ти вшими .
SFX KA ти вша .
SFX KA ти вшу .
SFX KA ти вшеј .
SFX KA ти вшеју .
SFX KA ти вше .
SFX KA ти ны .
SFX KA ти ного .
SFX KA ти ному .
SFX KA ти ным .
SFX KA ти ном .
SFX KA ти ни .
SFX KA ти не .
SFX KA ти ных .
SFX KA ти ными .
SFX KA ти на .
SFX KA ти ну .
SFX KA ти ној .
SFX KA ти ноју .
SFX KA ти но .
SFX KA ти нје/xPxE .
SFX KA ти нја/xPxE .
SFX KA ти нју/xPxE .
SFX KA ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX KA ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX KA ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX KA ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX KA ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX KB Y 21
SFX KB 0 0/xPxE .
SFX KB 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX KB ол л/xPxE .
SFX KB ол ли/xPxE .
SFX KB 0 и/xPxE .
SFX KB ол ла/xPxE .
SFX KB 0 а/xPxE .
SFX KB ол лов/xPxE .
SFX KB 0 ов/xPxE .
SFX KB ол лу/xPxE .
SFX KB 0 у/xPxE .
SFX KB ол лах/xPxE .
SFX KB 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX KB ол лам/xPxE .
SFX KB 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX KB ол лом/xPxE .
SFX KB 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX KB ол лами/xPxE .
SFX KB 0 ами/xPxE .
SFX KB ол ле/xPxE .
SFX KB 0 е/xPxE .

SFX KC Y 28
SFX KC 0 0/xPxE .
SFX KC ы о/xBxPxE .
SFX KC ы а/xPxE .
SFX KC ы ого/xPxE .
SFX KC ы у/xPxE .
SFX KC ы ој/xPxE .
SFX KC ы ом/xPxE .
SFX KC ы ому/xPxE .
SFX KC 0 м/xPxE .
SFX KC ы оју/xPxE .
SFX KC ы и/xPxE .
SFX KC ы е/xPxE .
SFX KC 0 х/xPxE .
SFX KC 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX KC злы горши/zx .
SFX KC злы горшего/zx .
SFX KC злы горшему/zx .
SFX KC злы горшим/zx .
SFX KC злы горшем/zx .
SFX KC злы горше/zx .
SFX KC злы горша/zx .
SFX KC злы горшу/zx .
SFX KC злы горшеј/zx .
SFX KC злы горшеју/zx .
SFX KC злы горших/zx .
SFX KC злы горшим/zx .
SFX KC злы горшими/zx .
SFX KC злы горје/zx .
