dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.dic
лгати/Jt
малы/Ju
какынебуд/Jv
морје/Jw
мох/Jx
натолкти/Jy
пекти/Jy
кторынебуд/Jv
хотєти/Jz
одповєдєти/KA
диавол/KB
злы/KC
сєкти/Jy
посол/KB
влєкти/Jy
полје/Jw
повєдєти/KA
рєкти/Jy
прєсєкти/Jy
текти/Jy
протекти/Jy
утекти/Jy
упекти/Jy
изтекти/Jy
прєтекти/Jy
хтєти/Jz
прєдповєдєти/KA
вєдєти/KA
посєкти/Jy
слгати/Jt
стекти/Jy
изсєкти/Jy
довєдєти/KA
изрєкти/Jy
одрєкти/Jy
прєрєкти/Jy
урєкти/Jy
зарєкти/Jy
произтекти/Jy
изповєдєти/KA
облєкти/Jy
одвлєкти/Jy
привлєкти/Jy
изпекти/Jy
изтолкти/Jy
извлєкти/Jy
нарєкти/Jy
насєкти/Jy
навлєкти/Jy
обсєкти/Jy
одсєкти/Jy
одтекти/Jy
разтекти/Jy
разтолкти/Jy
толкти/Jy
шчигол/KB
повлєкти/Jy
